Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.230

Director of probation services—Probation officers—Bailiffs.

The judges of the municipal court shall appoint a director of probation services who shall, under the direction and supervision of the court administrator of the municipal court, supervise the probation officers of the municipal court. The judges of the municipal court shall also appoint a bailiff for the court, together with such number of probation officers and additional bailiffs as may be authorized by the legislative body of the city. The director of probation services, probation officers, and bailiff or bailiffs shall be paid by the city treasurer in such amount as is deemed reasonable by the legislative body of the city: PROVIDED, That such additional probation officers and bailiffs of the court as may be authorized by the county commissioners shall be paid from the county treasury.

[ 1998 c 238 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.230. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 23.]